Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.090

Resignation of registered agent of foreign corporation.

The registered agent of a foreign corporation may resign as agent by executing and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

[ 2020 c 57 s 72; 2015 c 176 s 2138; 1989 c 165 s 177.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.